dev/verbs.fa.dix
    <pardef n="kard/an__vblex"> <!-- Tenses and non-finite forms formed from stem II -->
      <e>       <p><l>ن</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> 
      <e>       <p><l>ن</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C_verb"/></e> 
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ه</l><r><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ای</l><r><s n="ppgi"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agist</l><r><s n="pic"/></r></p><par n="kard.an__vblex"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="S__budan"/></e><!-- vowel a is امnot written in fa-->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="kard.an__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="me.kard/an__vblex"> <!-- Tenses formed from me- prefix and stem II -->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="kard.an__vblex"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r><s n="dur"/></r></p><par n="S__budan"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agist</l><r><s n="ftc"/></r></p><par n="kard.an__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

</pardefs>

    <e lm="donistan"><p><l>دانست</l><r>دانستن<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="kard/an__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="donistan"><p><l>ندانستن</l><r>دانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="kard/an__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="donistan"><p><l>می‍دانست</l><r>دانستن<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="me.kard/an__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="donistan"><p><l>نمی‍دانست</l><r>دانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="kard/an__vblex"/></e>
